Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-957
Central warehouse system; authorized.

The Department of Correctional Services is authorized to develop a central warehouse system for the ordering, purchasing, delivering, and billing for facilities and programs within the Department of Correctional Services of items stocked in the central warehouse system. The central warehouse system shall operate separately and distinctly from other department revolving-funded operations.

Laws 1999, LB 873, § 8.